scrapedcsv2yaml/yaml_output/VAI_V.yaml
     ataadiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ataadiwaad
     ataadiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: etaadiwaad
     ataadiwag+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Pl: etaadijig
     ataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indataage
     ataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindataage
     ataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidataage
     ataage+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataage
     ataage+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataaged
     ataage+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etaaged
     ataageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indataageshk
     ataageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindataageshk
     ataageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidataageshk
     ataageshki+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataageshki
     ataageshki+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataageshkid
     ataageshki+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etaageshkid
     ataaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indataas
     ataaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindataas
     ataaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidataas
     ataaso+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataaso
     ataaso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ataasod
     ataaso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etaasod
     atisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indatisige
     atisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindatisige
     atisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidatisige
     atisige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atisige 
     atisige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atisiged
     atisige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etisiged
     atiso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atiso
     atiso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atisod
     atiso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etisod
     atoono+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indatoon
     atoono+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindatoon
     atoono+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidatoon
     atoono+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atoono
     atoono+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: atoonod
     atoono+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: etoonod
     awasewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indawasewe
     awasewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindawasewe
     awasewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidawasewe
     awasewe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewe
     awasewe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewed
     awasewe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewasewed
     awasewebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indawasewebiz
     awasewebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewebizo
     awasewebizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awasewebizod
     awasewebizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewasewebizod
     awaseweyaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindawaseweyaadagaak
     awaseweyaadagaako+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaako
     awaseweyaadagaako+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaakod
     awaseweyaadagaame+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindawaseweyaadagaame
     awaseweyaadagaame+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaame
     awaseweyaadagaame+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaadagaamed
     awaseweyaada'e+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaada'e
     awaseweyaada'e+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awaseweyaada'ed
     awaseweyaada'e+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewaseweyaada'ed
     awazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indawaz
     awazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindawaz
     awazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ndawaz
     awazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awazo
     awazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awazod
     awazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewazod
     awi'iwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indawi'iwe
     awi'iwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindawi'iwe
     awi'iwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidawi'iwe
     awi'iwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awi'iwe
     awi'iwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: awi'iwed
     awi'iwe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ewi'iwed
     ayabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayab
     ayabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayab
     ayabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayab
     ayabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayabi
     ayabi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayabid
     ayabi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyabid
     ayadaawensi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayadaawens
     ayadaawensi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayadaawensi
     ayadaawensi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayadaawensid
     ayadaawensi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyadaawensid
     ayagaasizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayagaasizide
     ayagaasizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagaasizide
     ayagaasizide+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagaasizided
     ayagaasizide+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyagaasizided
     ayagoozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagoozi
     ayagoozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayagoozid
     ayagoozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyagoozid
     ayapakwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayapakwe
     ayapakwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayapakwe
     ayapakwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayapakwed
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayaangwaamiz
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayaangwaamiz
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayaangwaamiz
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaangwaamizi
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayaangwaamizid
     ayaangwaamizi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyaangwaamizid
     ayaaniginiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nindayaaniginimin
     ayaaniginiwag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayaaniginiwag
     ayaaniginiwag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayaaniginiwaagin
     ayaaniginiwag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: eyaaniniginiwaagin
     ayaanzigweshimowag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nindayaanzigweshimomin
     ayaanzigweshimowag+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayaanzigweshimowag
     ayaanzigweshimowag+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayaanzigweshimowaad
     ayaanzigweshimowag+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: eyaanzigweshimowaad
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayekobani'
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekobani'o
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekobani'od
     ayekobani'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekobani'od
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayekobani'
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekobani'o
     ayekobani'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekobani'od
     ayekobani'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekobani'od
     ayekogaade+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekogaade
     ayekogaade+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekogaaded
     ayekogaade+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekogaaded
     ayekogwayawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekogwayawe
     ayekogwayawe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekogwayawe
     ayekogwayawe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekogwayawed
     ayekogwayawe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekogwayawed
     ayekomanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekomanji' 
     ayekomanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekomanji'o
     ayekomanji'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekomanji'od
     ayekomanji'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekomanji'od
     ayekonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayekonaagoz
     ayekonaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekonaagozi
     ayekonaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekonaagozid
     ayekozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekoz
     ayekozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayekoz
     ayekozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayekoz
     ayekozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekozi
     ayekozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekozid
     ayekozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekozid
     ayekozide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekozide
     ayekozide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekozide
     ayekozide+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekozided
     ayekozide+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekozided
     ayekoziiwinaagozi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekoziiwinaagozi
     ayekoziiwinaagozi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekoziiwinaagozid
     ayekoziiwinaagozi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekoziiwinaagozid
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekwamanji'
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayekwamanji'
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayekwamanji'
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekwamanji'o
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekwamanji'od
     ayekwamanji'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekwamanji'od
     ayekwaawigane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayekwaawigane
     ayekwaawigane+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekwaawigane
     ayekwaawigane+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayekwaawiganed
     ayekwaawigane+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyekwaawiganed
     ayikwanagwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayikwanagwe
     ayikwanagwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayikwanagwe
     ayikwanagwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayikwanagwed
     ayina'e+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayina'e
     ayina'e+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayina'e
     ayina'e+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayina'ed
     ayina'e+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyina'ed
     ayinaabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayinaab
     ayinaabi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinaabi
     ayinaabi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinaabid
     ayinaabi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyinaabid
     ayinaajimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayinaajim
     ayinaajimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinaajimo
     ayinaajimo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinaajimod
     ayinaajimo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyinaajimod
     ayinaakonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayinaakonige
     ayinaakonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindayinaakonige
     ayinaakonige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidayinaakonige
     ayinaakonige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinaakoniged
     ayindazhishimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: nindayindazhishimomin
     ayindazhishimo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayindazhishimowag
     ayindazhishimo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Pl: ayindazhishimowaad
     ayindazhishimo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Pl: eyindazhishimowaad
     ayindi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayindid
     ayinendi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayinend
     ayinendi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinendi
     ayinendi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayinendid
     ayinendi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyinendid
     ayizhichige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indayizhichige
     ayizhichige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayizhichige
     ayizhichige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ayizhichiged
     ayizhichige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: eyizhichiged
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhashkiiw
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhashkiiw
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhashkiiw
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwi
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwid
     azhashkiiwi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhashkiiwid
     azhashkiiwishkige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhashkiiwishkige
     azhashkiiwishkige+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwishkige
     azhashkiiwishkige+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwishkiged
     azhashkiiwishkige+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhashkiiwishkiged
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhashkiiwizide
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhashkiiwizide
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhashkiiwizide
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwizide
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhashkiiwizided
     azhashkiiwizide+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhashkiiwizided
     azaadiisagokaazo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azaadiisagokaazo
     azaadiisagokaazo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azaadiisagokaazod
     azaadiisagokaazo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezaadiisagokaazod
     azaadiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazaadiiw
     azaadiiwi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azaadiiwi
     azaadiiwi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azaadiiwid
     azaadiiwi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezaadiiwid
     azhaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhaas
     azhaaso+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhaaso
     azhaaso+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhaasod
     azhaaso+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhaasod
     azhebani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhebani'
     azhebani'o+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebani'o
     azhebani'o+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebani'od
     azhebani'o+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhebani'od
     azhebi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazheb
     azhebi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebi
     azhebi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebid
     azhebi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhebid
     azhebi+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: azhebin
     azhebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhebiz
     azhebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhebiz
     azhebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhebiz
     azhebizo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebizo
     azhebizo+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebizod
     azhebizo+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhebizod
     azhebowe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhebowe
     azhebowe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhebowe
     azhebowe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhebowe
     azhebowe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebowe
     azhebowe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhebowed
     azhebowe+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhebowed
     azhebowe+VAI+Imp+Pos+Neu+2Sg: azhebowen
     azheboye+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazheboye
     azheboye+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazheboye
     azheboye+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazheboye
     azheboye+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheboye
     azheboye+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azheboyed
     azheboye+VAI+Particip+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezheboyed
     azhegaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhegaabaw
     azhegaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhegaabaw
     azhegaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhegaabaw
     azhegaabawi+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhegaabawi
     azhegaabawi+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhegaabawid
     azhegaabawi+VAI+?+Pos+Neu+3Sg: ezhegaabawid
     azhegiiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: indazhegiiwe
     azhegiiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nindazhegiiwe
     azhegiiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nidazhegiiwe
     azhegiiwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhegiiwe
     azhegiiwe+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3Sg: azhegiiwed
